Washington statutes.
RCW 1.70.020

Applicability.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this chapter applies to all legal material in an electronic record that is designated as official under RCW 1.70.030 and first published electronically on or after January 1, 2018.

(2) This chapter applies to issues of the Washington State Register in an official electronic record that were first published on or after May 7, 2008.

[ 2017 c 106 s 3.]